Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-2070
Internationally trained physician; provisional or transitional license; disciplinary action; grounds; procedure.

(1) In addition to other grounds for disciplinary action against the license under the Uniform Credentialing Act, the department may take disciplinary action, including suspension and revocation, against a license granted pursuant to section 38-2066 or 38-2067 for professional misconduct, noncompliance with licensure requirements, or an unsatisfactory assessment or evaluation submitted by a participating health care entity. In determining whether an assessment or evaluation is unsatisfactory under this subsection, the department may consider the totality of assessment data generated under an approved assessment and evaluation program, including repeated deficiencies in one or more general competencies and the physician's response to remediation. The department shall consider any board recommendation relating to an assessment or evaluation described in this section.

(2) A provisional or transitional license may be suspended, pending a full disciplinary review by the department if, in the judgment of a participating health care entity, the internationally trained physician's practice jeopardizes the health and well-being of a patient.

Laws 2026, LB1212, § 8.
August 1, 2027